Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB572.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 74 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 8117.1. State intercept for unpaid tolls.(a) Duty of Department of Revenue in intercept of State lottery winnings.--If a person claims State lottery winnings that exceed $2,500, the Department of Revenue shall, after making its determination subject to 23 Pa.C.S. § 4308 (relating to lottery winnings intercept):(1) In consultation with the commission, make a reasonable effort to determine if the person owes the commission unpaid tolls, including any associated fee or penalty, prior to making a lottery winnings payment.(2) If the department determines that the person owes 123456789101112131415161718 the commission unpaid tolls, including any associated fee or penalty, intercept and deduct the amount owed from the amount of lottery winnings and remit the deducted amount to the commission for distribution pursuant to applicable law.(3) Notify the claimant of the remittance to the commission.(4) Pay the balance of the lottery winnings to the claimant in accordance with law.(b) Duty of Department of Revenue in intercept of State income tax.--If a taxpayer is due a refund of tax under Article III of the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971, the Department of Revenue shall, after making its determination subject to 23 Pa.C.S. § 4307 (relating to State income tax intercept):(1) In consultation with the commission, make a reasonable effort to determine if the person owes to the commission unpaid tolls, including any associated fee or penalty, prior to paying the refund.(2) If the department determines that the person owes the commission unpaid tolls, including any associated fee or penalty, intercept and deduct the amount owed from the refund and remit the deducted amount to the commission.(3) Notify the taxpayer of the remittance to the commission.(4) Pay the balance of the refund to the taxpayer in accordance with applicable law.(c) Right to review.--A person whose lottery winnings or tax refund is used to satisfy an owed turnpike toll obligation under this section may appeal in accordance with applicable law. The appeal must be filed within 30 days after the person is notified 20250SB0572PN0582 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 by the Department of Revenue that the winnings or refund have been reduced or totally withheld to satisfy the person's outstanding toll obligation.(d) Administrative fee.--The Department of Revenue may establish a fee to cover actual costs to administer this section and may deduct the fee from the winnings or refund subject to intercept under this section.(e) Report.--The Department of Revenue, in consultation with the commission, shall annually report to the Transportation Committee of the Senate and the Transportation Committee of the House of Representatives the amount of unpaid tolls collected under this section.(f) Rules and regulations.--The Department of Revenue, in consultation with the commission, may promulgate the rules and regulations necessary to carry out this section.(g) Duty of commission.--The commission shall provide to the Department of Revenue information necessary to fulfill the department's duties under this section.(h) Construction.--Nothing in this section shall be construed to provide a right to payment or intercept by the commission that has priority to the right to payment or intercept by another State agency as provided by law.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 90 days.20250SB0572PN0582 - 3 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223